District of Columbia statutes.
11-503

Removal of cases from the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

A civil action or criminal prosecution in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia is removable to the United States District Court for the District of Columbia in accordance with chapter 89 of title 28, United States Code.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 478, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
1981 Ed., § 11-503.
1973 Ed., § 11-503.